Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.420

Organization—Revision of appropriations.

If, at the beginning of the term of office of the first commission elected in a city organized under the commission form, the appropriations for the expenditures of the city for the current fiscal year have been made, the commission, by ordinance, may revise them.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.420. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 19; RRS s 9108.]